District of Columbia statutes.
47-4213

Failure to file return or to pay tax.

(a)

(1)

In case of failure to file a return required by this title on the date prescribed (determined with regard to any extension of time for filing), unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect, there shall be added to the amount required to be shown as tax on the return 5% of the amount of the tax if the failure is for not more than one month, with an additional 5% for each additional month or fraction thereof during which the failure continues, not exceeding 25% in the aggregate. The amount of tax required to be shown on the return shall be reduced by the amount of the tax which is paid on or before the date prescribed for payment of the tax and by the amount of any credit against the tax which may be claimed on the return.

(2)

In the case of a failure to pay the amount shown as tax on a return specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection on or before the date prescribed for payment of the tax (determined with regard to any extension of time for payment), unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect, there shall be added to the amount shown as tax on the return 5% of the amount of the tax if the failure is for not more than one month, with an additional 5% for each additional month or fraction thereof during which the failure continues, not exceeding 25% in the aggregate. For purposes of computing the addition for a month, the amount of tax shown on the return shall be reduced by the amount of the tax which is paid on or before the beginning of the month and by the amount of any credit against the tax which may be claimed on the return.

(3)

In the case of a failure to pay an amount in respect of a tax that is required to be shown on a return specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection which is not shown (including an assessment made under this title), within 30 calendar days from the date of notice and demand for payment, unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect, there shall be added to the amount of tax stated in the notice and demand 5% of the amount of the tax if the failure is for not more than one month, with an additional 5% for each additional month or fraction thereof during which the failure continues, not exceeding 25% in the aggregate. For the purpose of computing the addition for a month, the amount of tax stated in the notice and demand shall be reduced by the amount of the tax which is paid before the beginning of the month.

(b)

With respect to a return, the amount of the addition under subsection (a)(1) of this section shall be reduced by the amount of the addition under subsection (a)(2) of this section for any month (or fraction thereof) to which an addition to tax applies under both subsection (a)(1) and (2) of this section.

(c)

This section shall not apply to a failure to pay an estimated tax required to be paid by this title.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 403(b), 48 DCR 334

History

This section is referenced in § 47-2024, § 47-4201, § 47-4221, and § 47-4222.

Section References